Utah statutes.
31A-22-628.   Standing referral to a specialist.

(1) With respect to a health insurance policy or health maintenance organization contract that does not allow an insured to have direct access to a health care specialist, the insurer shall establish and implement a procedure by which an insured may obtain a standing referral to a health care specialist.

(2)  The procedure established under Subsection (1):

(a)  shall provide for a standing referral to a specialist if the insured's primary care provider determines, in consultation with the specialist, that the insured needs continuing care from the specialist; and

(b)  may require the insurer's approval of a treatment plan designed by the specialist, in consultation with the primary care provider and the insured, which may include:

(i)  a limit on the number of visits to the specialist;

(ii)  a time limit on the duration of the referral; and

(iii)  mandatory updates on the insured's condition.

